Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,122
Land survey; where filed.

When the county shall receive an official copy of a survey from a professional land surveyor or from the survey record repository established pursuant to section 84-412, such copy shall be placed on file in the office of the county surveyor in the county where the land is located. If no regular office is maintained in a county-owned building for the county surveyor, it shall be placed on file in the office of the county clerk.

Laws 1957, c. 383, § 15, p. 1337;

Laws 1982, LB 127, § 10;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 38.
September 1, 2024